West Virginia, session 2026, HB5472.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5H. SURVIVOR BENEFITS. ARTICLE 1. WEST VIRGINIA EMERGENCY RESPONDERS SURVIVOR BENEFIT ACT. §5H-1-2. First responder survivor benefit. (a) Terms. — For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) "Emergency responder" means a paid or volunteer firefighter, EMS personnel, law-enforcement agency personnel, or Division of Forestry personnel, or mine rescue personnel.(2) "Emergency response duties" means:(A) For a firefighter, EMS provider, or law-enforcement agency personnel, participation in any role of a fire department, EMS agency, or law-enforcement agency function, including, but not limited to: Training functions; administrative meetings; fire department, EMS agency, or law-enforcement incidents or service calls; apparatus, equipment, or station maintenance; and fundraisers, including travel to or from such functions; and(B) For a Division of Forestry employee, participation in Division of Forestry wildland fire fighting, emergency, or disaster response operations, including, but not limited to, travel to and from the locations of wildland fires, emergencies, or disasters; and(C) For mine rescue personnel, participation in mine rescue and recovery operations or mine emergency response activities, including, but not limited to: (i) Responding to mine explosions, fires, inundations, roof falls, ventilation failures, entrapments, or other mine emergencies; (ii) Training and drills required for mine rescue team service; (iii) The use, care, inspection, testing, and maintenance of mine rescue breathing apparatus and related rescue equipment; (iv) Participation in mine rescue contests or simulations that are part of required refresher training; and (v) Travel to or from mine rescue training, drills, contests, stations, or emergency deployments when authorized by the mine operator or the responsible mine rescue official.(3) "Law-enforcement agency" means any duly authorized state, county, or municipal organization employing one or more persons whose responsibility is the enforcement of laws of the state or any county or municipality thereof: Provided, That neither the Public Service Commission nor any state institution of higher education nor any resort area district is a law-enforcement agency.(4) "Travel" includes riding upon or in any apparatus or vehicle which is owned or used by the fire department, EMS agency, law-enforcement agency, or the Division of Forestry, mine rescue team, or any other vehicle going to, or directly returning from, an emergency responder’s home, place of business, or other place where he or she shall have been prior to participating in a fire department function, EMS agency function, law-enforcement agency function, or a Division of Forestry wildland fire-fighting operation, or a mine rescue function, or upon the authorization of the chief of the department, agency head, or other person in charge.(5) "Mine rescue personnel" means an individual who is a member or alternate of a mine rescue team established or maintained pursuant to applicable state or federal mine safety law, and who, at the time of the incident giving rise to eligibility under this section:(A) Has successfully completed initial mine rescue training in the use, care, and maintenance of the breathing apparatus to be used and related mine rescue procedures, as required or approved by the West Virginia Office of Miners’ Health, Safety and Training or the Mine Safety and Health Administration;(B) Has completed required mine rescue refresher training within the preceding twelve months consistent with applicable state or federal standards;(C) Holds a current first-aid training certificate required for mine rescue team service; and(D) For purposes of this article, "mine rescue personnel" does not include individuals who do not meet the training and qualification requirements of this subdivision.(b) An emergency responder who dies as a proximate result of the performance of his or her emergency response duties is eligible for the survivor benefits established by this act. (c) Within 30 days after the death of an eligible emergency responder, the department or agency head, or in the case of mine rescue personnel, the mine operator, mine rescue station director, mine rescue team captain, or other authorized representative responsible for the mine rescue team, shall submit certification of the death to the Governor’s Office. Certification of the death shall include the name of the certified fire department, EMS agency, law-enforcement agency, or Division of Forestry program, or the mine rescue team, mine rescue station, or mine operator responsible for the mine rescue personnel, the name of the deceased emergency responder, the name or names and addresses of the beneficiary or beneficiaries, any documentation designating a beneficiary or beneficiaries, and a description of the circumstances that qualify the deceased individual for survivor benefits under this act. (d) Upon receipt of the certification of the death from the certified fire department, EMS agency, law-enforcement agency, or Division of Forestry program, or from the mine rescue team, mine rescue station, or mine operator responsible for the mine rescue personnel, the state shall, from moneys from the State Treasury, General Fund, pay to the certified fire department, EMS agency, law-enforcement agency, or Division of Forestry program, or the mine rescue team, mine rescue station, or mine operator responsible for the mine rescue personnel the sum of $100,000 in the name of the beneficiary or beneficiaries of the emergency responder eligible for the survivor benefit. Within five days of receipt of this sum from the state, the fire department, EMS agency, law-enforcement agency, or Division of Forestry Program, or from the mine rescue team, mine rescue station, or mine operator responsible for the mine rescue personnel shall pay the sum as a benefit to the surviving designated beneficiary or beneficiaries. If there is no surviving designated beneficiary, then the sum shall be paid as if the decedent had designated as beneficiaries those persons who are entitled to inherit the decedent’s intestate estate, in the proportions established by §42-1-3 and §42-1-3a of this code. It is the responsibility of the certified fire department, EMS agency, law-enforcement agency, or Division of Forestry program, mine rescue team, mine rescue station, or mine operator to document the beneficiary or beneficiaries above mentioned for purposes of reporting to the Governor’s Office.(e) Any death ruled by a physician to be a result of an injury sustained during performance of emergency response duties makes a deceased emergency responder eligible for this benefit, regardless of when the death occurs.(f) The death of an eligible emergency responder qualifies his or her beneficiaries for only one state survivor benefit, paid pursuant to the provisions of this section, regardless of the amount.(g) Every department or agency head employing persons to which this article applies shall provide notice of the benefit provided hereby to such employees and encourage covered employees to provide a written designation of beneficiary to be maintained in the employee’s personnel file.(h) A person applying to the State Fire Marshal for certification as a firefighter shall provide a written designation of beneficiary using forms and procedures prescribed by the State Fire Marshal. (i) A person applying to the Commissioner of the Bureau for Public Health for emergency medical services personnel certification shall provide a written designation of beneficiary using forms and procedures prescribed by the commissioner. CHAPTER 17A. MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, REGISTRATION, CERTIFICATE OF TITLE, AND ANTITHEFT PROVISIONS. ARTICLE 3. ORIGINAL AND RENEWAL OF REGISTRATION; ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATES OF TITLE. §17A-3-14g. Special registration plates for first responders. (a) The division may issue special emergency or volunteer registration plates as follows:(1) Any owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident of the state of West Virginia and who is a certified paramedic or emergency medical technician, member of a paid fire department, member of the State Fire Commission, the State Fire Marshal, State Fire Marshal assistant, State Fire Administrator, or voluntary rescue squad member may apply for a special license plate for any number of Class A vehicles titled in the name of the qualified applicant which bears the insignia of the profession, group, or commission. Any insignia shall be designed by the commissioner. License plates issued pursuant to this subsection shall bear the requested insignia in addition to the registration number issued to the applicant pursuant to the provisions of this article.(2) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by an affidavit signed by the fire chief or department head of the applicant stating that the applicant is justified in having a registration with the requested insignia, proof of compliance with all laws of this state regarding registration and licensure of motor vehicles, and payment of all required fees.(3) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by payment of a special initial application fee of $10, which is in addition to all other fees required by this chapter. All special fees shall be collected by the division and deposited into the State Road Fund.(b) The division may issue special certified firefighter registration plates as follows:(1) Any owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident of the state of West Virginia and who is a certified firefighter may apply for a special license plate that bears the insignia of the profession for any number of Class A vehicles titled in the name of the qualified applicant. Any insignia shall be designed by the commissioner. License plates issued pursuant to this subsection shall bear the requested insignia pursuant to the provisions of this article. Upon presentation of written evidence of certification as a certified firefighter, certified firefighters are eligible to purchase the special registration plate issued pursuant to this subsection.(2) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating that the applicant is justified in having a registration with the requested insignia, proof of compliance with all laws of this state regarding registration and licensure of motor vehicles, and payment of all required fees. The firefighter certification department, section, or division of the West Virginia University fire service extension shall notify the commissioner in writing immediately when a firefighter loses his or her certification. If a firefighter loses his or her certification, the commissioner may not issue him or her a license plate under this subsection.(3) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by payment of a special initial application fee of $10, which is in addition to all other fees required by this chapter. All special fees shall be collected by the division and deposited into the State Road Fund.(c) The division may issue special volunteer firefighter registration plates as follows:(1) Any owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident of West Virginia and who is a volunteer firefighter may apply for a special license plate for any Class A vehicle titled in the name of the qualified applicant which bears the insignia of the profession in white letters on a red background. The insignia shall be designed by the commissioner and shall contain a fireman’s helmet insignia on the left side of the license plate.(2) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by an affidavit signed by the applicant’s fire chief, stating that the applicant is a volunteer firefighter and is justified in having a registration plate with the requested insignia. The applicant must comply with all other laws of this state regarding registration and licensure of motor vehicles and must pay all required fees.(3) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by payment of a special one-time initial application fee of $10, which is in addition to all other fees required by this chapter. All application fees shall be deposited into the State Road Fund.(d) The division may issue special registration plates to applicants supporting law-enforcement officers, to retired members of the West Virginia State Police, and to survivors of wounds received in the line of duty as a member with a West Virginia law-enforcement agency as follows:(1) Upon appropriate application, the division shall issue a special registration plate designed by the commissioner which recognizes, supports, and honors the men and women of law-enforcement and includes the words "Back the Blue". Upon appropriate application, the division shall issue to any member of a municipal police department, sheriff’s department, the State Police, or the law-enforcement division of the Division of Natural Resources who has been wounded in the line of duty and awarded a Purple Heart in recognition thereof by the West Virginia Chiefs of Police Association, the West Virginia Sheriffs’ Association, the West Virginia Troopers Association, or the Division of Natural Resources a special registration plate for one vehicle titled in the name of the qualified applicant with an insignia appropriately designed by the commissioner.(2) For special registration plates supporting law-enforcement officers, the division shall charge a special initial application fee of $10 in addition to all other fees required by this chapter. This special fee shall be collected by the division and deposited in the State Road Fund. An annual fee of $15 shall be charged for each plate supporting law-enforcement officers in addition to all other fees required by this chapter.(3) Registration plates issued pursuant to this subsection to survivors of wounds received in the line of duty as a member with a West Virginia law-enforcement agency are exempt from the registration fees otherwise required by the provisions of this chapter. A surviving spouse may continue to use his or her deceased spouse’s special registration plate until the surviving spouse dies, remarries, or does not renew the plate. Survivors of wounds received in the line of duty as a member with a West Virginia law-enforcement agency may obtain a license plate as described in this subsection for use on a passenger vehicle titled in the name of the qualified applicant. The division shall charge for the second plate a one-time fee of $10, to be deposited into the State Road Fund, which is in addition to all other fees required by this chapter.(4) Upon appropriate application, the division may issue special registration plates designed by the commissioner for any number of vehicles titled in the name of the qualified applicant who offers sufficient proof of being a retired member of the West Virginia State Police. The division shall charge a special initial application fee of $10 in addition to all other fees required by this chapter. This special fee shall be collected by the division and deposited in the State Road Fund.(e) The division may issue special plates with an insignia appropriately designed by the commissioner to recipients of the distinguished Medal of Valor awarded under §29-32-1 et seq. of this code to firefighters, law-enforcement officers, and emergency medical services personnel, and mine rescue personnel who distinguish themselves conspicuously by gallantry and intrepidity at the risk of their lives above and beyond the call of duty in the performance of their duties as follows:(1) Any Medal of Valor recipient under §29-32-1 et seq. of this code or their surviving spouse may apply to receive the special registration plate issued pursuant to this subsection for any Class A vehicle titled in the name of the Medal of Valor recipient or their surviving spouse. (2) The applicant shall present satisfactory proof as determined by the commissioner as evidence of qualification for any plate authorized in this subsection. A surviving spouse may continue to use the license plate of his or her deceased spouse that was issued pursuant to this subsection until the surviving spouse dies, remarries, or does not renew the license plate.(3) A qualified applicant as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection may apply for a second license plate as described in this subsection for use on a Class A vehicle titled in the name of the qualified applicant.(4) Registration plates issued pursuant to this subsection to qualified applicants are exempt from the registration fees otherwise required by the provisions of this chapter. A qualified applicant may obtain a license plate as described in this subsection for use on a passenger vehicle titled in the name of the qualified applicant. The division shall charge for the second plate a one-time fee of $10, to be deposited into the State Road Fund, which is in addition to all other fees required by this chapter.(f) The division may issue special mine rescue registration plates as follows:(1) Any owner of a motor vehicle who is a resident of West Virginia and who is a mine rescue personnel may apply for a special license plate for any Class A vehicle titled in the name of the qualified applicant which bears the insignia of the profession. The insignia shall be designed by the commissioner.(2) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by an affidavit signed by the applicant’s mine rescue team captain, mine rescue station director, mine superintendent, or other authorized representative responsible for the mine rescue team, stating that the applicant is a mine rescue personnel and is justified in having a registration plate with the requested insignia. The applicant must comply with all other laws of this state regarding registration and licensure of motor vehicles and must pay all required fees.(3) Each application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by payment of a special one-time initial application fee of $10, which is in addition to all other fees required by this chapter. All application fees shall be deposited into the State Road Fund. CHAPTER 23. WORKERS' COMPENSATION. ARTICLE 4. DISABILITY AND DEATH BENEFITS. §23-4-1f. Certain psychiatric injuries and diseases not compensable; definitions; legislative findings; terms; report required. (a) Except as provided by this section, for the purposes of this chapter, no alleged injury or disease may be recognized as a compensable injury or disease which was solely caused by nonphysical means and which did not result in any physical injury or disease to the person claiming benefits. Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is the purpose of this section to clarify that so-called mental-mental claims are not compensable under this chapter.(b) For the purposes of this section: (1) "First responder" means a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician, paramedic, and emergency dispatcher, and mine rescue personnel;(2) "Post-traumatic stress disorder" means a disorder that meets the diagnostic criteria for post-traumatic stress disorder specified by the American Psychiatric Association in the Diagnosticand Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, fifth edition, or a later edition as adopted by rule of the insurance commissioner; and(3) "Licensed mental health provider" means a licensed psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, licensed professional counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, certified mental health nurse practitioner, certified psychiatric physician assistant, or licensed social worker who: (A) Holds a master's degree or higher;(B) Holds a terminal license within their profession; and(C) Is qualified to treat post-traumatic stress disorder.(4) "Employer" means any entity that controls, consistent with the provisions of West Virginia law relating to an employment relationship, the paid or volunteer employment of a first responder eligible for benefits under this section.(c) The Legislature finds that post-traumatic stress disorder is a unique medical condition. Although it may manifest itself as a psychiatric condition that would be otherwise precluded from workers' compensation coverage, post-traumatic stress disorder is an occupational hazard for first responders, similar to members of the military serving in combat. The Legislature further finds that because first responders are required to expose themselves to traumatic events during the course of their employment and thus are at a recognized higher risk of developing post-traumatic stress disorder, and because of the severe nature and debilitative effects of post-traumatic stress disorder, it is the moral obligation of the state to permit coverage to this class of individuals for their work-related disease.(d)(1) Post-traumatic stress disorder suffered by a first responder may be recognized as a compensable occupational disease under §23-4-1(f) of this code when:(A) The employer has elected to provide coverage for post-traumatic stress disorder as an occupational disease; and(B) A diagnosis has been made by a licensed psychiatrist, certified mental health nurse practitioner, or certified psychiatric physician assistant that the first responder suffered from post-traumatic stress disorder due to exposure to an event or events that occurred in the course of and resulting from the first responder's paid or volunteer covered employment: Provided, That the provisions of this section shall apply only to a post-traumatic stress disorder diagnosis made on or after July 1, 2021, or the first day of the employer's next workers' compensation insurance policy or self-insurance program term for which post-traumatic stress disorder coverage has been purchased or elected, whichever is later. (2) While the diagnosis must be made by a licensed psychiatrist, certified mental health nurse practitioner, or certified psychiatric physician assistant, mental health treatment consistent for a post-traumatic stress disorder diagnosis may be offered by a licensed mental health provider other than the diagnosing psychiatrist, certified mental health nurse practitioner, or certified psychiatric physician assistant.(3) A diagnosis of post-traumatic stress disorder under this section may not include consideration of any layoff, termination, disciplinary action, or any similar personnel-related action taken in good faith by an employer.(4) Benefits for a post-traumatic stress disorder diagnosis made under this section are contingent upon the employer electing to provide coverage for post-traumatic stress disorder from its workers' compensation insurance carrier or to provide for it through its self-insurance program, whichever is applicable. (5) The receipt of benefits is contingent on a claim being made within three years from and after a licensed psychiatrist, certified mental health nurse practitioner, or certified psychiatric physician assistant has made the claimant aware of a post-traumatic stress disorder diagnosis in accordance with this section. CHAPTER 29. MISCELLANEOUS BOARDS AND OFFICERS. ARTICLE 32. MEDAL OF VALOR. §29-32-1. Medal of Valor. (a) There is hereby established a Medal of Valor to be awarded to firefighters, law-enforcement officers, and emergency medical services personnel, and mine rescue personnel who distinguish themselves conspicuously by gallantry and intrepidity at the risk of their lives above and beyond the call of duty in the performance of their duties.(b) A Medal of Valor may only be awarded in the manner set forth in this article.(c) For purposes of this article, "mine rescue personnel" has the meaning set forth in §5H-1-2(a) of this code. §29-32-2. First Responders Honor Board. (a) The First Responders Honor Board is hereby established within the Department of Homeland Security as an advisory board to the Legislature. The purpose of the board is to recommend to the Legislature firefighters, law-enforcement officers, and emergency medical services personnel, and mine rescue personnel in West Virginia who have distinguished themselves conspicuously by gallantry and intrepidity at the risk of their lives above and beyond the call of duty in the performance of their duties to be awarded a Medal of Valor.(b) Board membership. —(1) The board shall consist of two members from each of the state’s senatorial districts. Each state senator shall appoint one member representing his or her district.(2) The board shall be composed of firefighters; fire chiefs; law enforcement officials such as sheriffs, correctional officers, and police chiefs; emergency medical services personnel; medical officials; doctors; mine rescue personnel; and other professionals who are qualified to evaluate and determine whether the actions of firefighters, law-enforcement officers, and emergency medical services personnel, and mine rescue personnel rise to the level of being above and beyond the call of duty.(3) Members shall serve a three-year term and shall serve without compensation.(4) The board shall annually select a member to serve as the chair. The board shall hold at least one annual meeting. The date, time, and place of the meetings shall be established upon its own resolution or at the call of the chair of the board. Notice of each meeting shall be given to each member by the chair and in compliance with the open meetings laws of the state. A majority of the members of the board serving at any one time constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.(c) The board may consider candidates for the Medal of Valor who are identified by members of the board or by other citizens, and may design a system for the receipt of those recommendations.(d) The board shall review identified individuals to determine if those firefighters, law-enforcement officers, and emergency medical services personnel, and mine rescue personnel have gone above and beyond the call of duty in their professional capacities. Upon determination that a firefighter, law-enforcement officer, or emergency medical services personnel, and mine rescue personnel is worthy of this honor, the board shall submit the nomination to the Speaker of the House of Delegates and the President of the Senate for consideration by the Legislature no later than the first day of the next legislative session, whether a regular session or extraordinary session.